Illinois, session 104th, HB5340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Legislative Commission Reorganization Act 5of 1984 is amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 130/1-1)  (from Ch. 63, par. 1001-1)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of 1984.9(Source: P.A. 83-1257.)